Louisiana, session 2026, HB460.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:1016(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1016. Employment discrimination; physician recommended marijuana
* * *
D. The provisions of this Section shall apply to all departments, agencies,
and employees within the state classified service and unclassified service and shall
be binding upon the State Civil Service Commission and all appointing authorities.